test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_ING_STEM_2.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_ING_STEM_2 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_ING_STEM_2

     ñíng+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñyáangaa
     ñíng+V+INDIRECT+PAST: ñyáangaan
     ñíng+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: ñyáangaas
     ñíng+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: ñyáangaa.ang
     ñíng+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: ñyáang'ahlanggang
     ñíng+V+CERTAIN+PAST: ñyáang'ahlanggan
     ñíng+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: ñyáang'ahlanggiinii
     ñíng+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: ñyáang'ahlans
     ñíng+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: ñyáangaa'ahlang
     ñíng+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: ñyáangaa'ahlanggaa
     ñíng+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: ñyáangaa'ahlanggang
     ñíng+V+REFLEXIVE: ñyáang'ahl
